Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2104
Public awareness activities; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct public awareness activities designed to promote the prevention of sudden infant death syndrome and abusive head trauma in infants and children. The public awareness activities may include, but not be limited to, public service announcements, information kits and brochures, and the promotion of preventive telephone hotlines.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 150;

Laws 2019, LB60, § 4.